Massachusetts, session 194th, S2075.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of section 5 of said chapter 62, as so
appearing, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 6, the words “eight thousand dollars” and
inserting in place thereof the following figure:- $12,550.
SECTION 2. Said subsection (a) of said section 5 of said chapter 62, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking out paragraph (2) and inserting in place thereof the following 2
paragraphs:-
(2) in the case of a husband and wife filing a joint return, $25,100, or
(3) in the case of a person filing as head of household, $18,800.
of 1